Illinois, session 104th, SB3094.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 10-9, 11-9.3, and 11-25 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/10-9)7    Sec. 10-9. Trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 8and related offenses.9    (a) Definitions. In this Section:10    (1) "Intimidation" has the meaning prescribed in Section 1112-6.12    (2) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sex act on 13account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or 14received by any person. 15    (2.5) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, 16organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 17venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 18limited liability limited partnership, limited liability 19company, or other entity or business association, including 20all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 21parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 22associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit. 23    (3) "Financial harm" includes intimidation that brings   SB3094- 2 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1about financial loss, criminal usury, or employment contracts 2that violate the Frauds Act.3    (4) (Blank).4    (5) "Labor" means work of economic or financial value.5    (6) "Maintain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 6secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any 7initial agreement on the part of the victim to perform that 8type of service.9    (7) "Obtain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 10secure performance thereof.11    (7.5) "Serious harm" means any harm, whether physical or 12nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or 13reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the 14surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of 15the same background and in the same circumstances to perform 16or to continue performing labor or services in order to avoid 17incurring that harm. 18    (8) "Services" means activities resulting from a 19relationship between a person and the actor in which the 20person performs activities under the supervision of or for the 21benefit of the actor. Commercial sexual activity and 22sexually-explicit performances are forms of activities that 23are "services" under this Section. Nothing in this definition 24may be construed to legitimize or legalize prostitution.25    (9) "Sexually-explicit performance" means a live, 26recorded, broadcast (including over the Internet), or public   SB3094- 3 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1act or show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or 2appeal to the prurient interests of patrons.3    (10) "Trafficking victim" means a person subjected to the 4practices set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d).5    (b) Involuntary servitude. A person commits involuntary 6servitude when he or she knowingly subjects, attempts to 7subject, or engages in a conspiracy to subject another person 8to labor or services obtained or maintained through any of the 9following means, or any combination of these means: 10        (1) causes or threatens to cause physical harm to any 11    person;12        (2) physically restrains or threatens to physically 13    restrain another person;14        (3) abuses or threatens to abuse the law or legal 15    process;16        (4) attempts to or knowingly destroys, conceals, 17    removes, confiscates, or possesses any actual or purported 18    passport or other immigration document, or any other 19    actual or purported government identification document, of 20    another person;21        (5) uses intimidation, abuses a position of trust, 22    authority, or supervision in relation to the victim, 23    through the use or deprivation of any alcoholic 24    intoxicant, a drug as defined or used in the Illinois 25    Controlled Substances Act or the Cannabis Control Act, or 26    methamphetamine as defined in the Methamphetamine Control   SB3094- 4 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1    and Community Protection Act, or exerts financial control 2    over any person; or3        (6) uses any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to 4    cause the person to believe that, if the person did not 5    perform the labor or services, that person or another 6    person would suffer serious harm or physical restraint. 7    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 8or (f), a violation of subsection (b)(1) is a Class X felony, 9(b)(2) is a Class 1 felony, (b)(3) is a Class 2 felony, (b)(4) 10is a Class 3 felony, (b)(5) and (b)(6) is a Class 4 felony. 11    (c) Involuntary sexual servitude of a minor. A person 12commits involuntary sexual servitude of a minor when he or she 13knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or 14obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, 15provide, or obtain by any means, another person under 18 years 16of age, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial 17sexual activity, a sexually-explicit performance, or the 18production of pornography, or causes or attempts to cause a 19minor to engage in one or more of those activities and:20        (1) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 21    between the ages of 17 and 18 years;22        (2) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 23    under the age of 17 years; or24        (3) there is overt force or threat.25    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 26or (f), a violation of subsection (c)(1) is a Class 1 felony,   SB3094- 5 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1(c)(2) is a Class X felony, and (c)(3) is a Class X felony. 2    (d) Trafficking in persons. A person commits trafficking 3in persons when he or she knowingly: (1) recruits, entices, 4harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, or 5attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or 6obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that 7the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude; or (2) 8benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from 9participation in a venture that has engaged in an act of 10involuntary servitude or involuntary sexual servitude of a 11minor. A company commits trafficking in persons when the 12company knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving 13anything of value, from participation in a venture that has 14engaged in an act of involuntary servitude or involuntary 15sexual servitude of a minor.16    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 17or (f), a violation of this subsection by a person is a Class 1 18felony. A violation of this subsection by a company is a 19business offense for which a fine of up to $100,000 may be 20imposed.21    (e) Aggravating factors. A violation of this Section 22involving kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated 23criminal sexual assault or an attempt to commit aggravated 24criminal sexual assault, or an attempt to commit first degree 25murder is a Class X felony. 26    (f) Sentencing considerations.  SB3094- 6 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1        (1) Bodily injury. If, pursuant to a violation of this 2    Section, a victim suffered bodily injury, the defendant 3    may be sentenced to an extended-term sentence under 4    Section 5-8-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 5    sentencing court must take into account the time in which 6    the victim was held in servitude, with increased penalties 7    for cases in which the victim was held for between 180 days 8    and one year, and increased penalties for cases in which 9    the victim was held for more than one year.10        (2) Number of victims. In determining sentences within 11    statutory maximums, the sentencing court should take into 12    account the number of victims, and may provide for 13    substantially increased sentences in cases involving more 14    than 10 victims.15        (3) Age of victim. In determining sentences, the 16    sentencing court shall take into account the age of the 17    victim or victims. 18    (g) Restitution. Restitution is mandatory under this 19Section. In addition to any other amount of loss identified, 20the court shall order restitution including the greater of (1) 21the gross income or value to the defendant of the victim's 22labor or services or (2) the value of the victim's labor as 23guaranteed under the Minimum Wage Law and overtime provisions 24of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) or the Minimum Wage Law, 25whichever is greater.26    (g-5) Fine distribution. If the court imposes a fine under   SB3094- 7 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section, it shall be 2collected and distributed to the Specialized Services for 3Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund in accordance with Section 45-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 5    (h) Trafficking victim services. Subject to the 6availability of funds, the Department of Human Services may 7provide or fund emergency services and assistance to 8individuals who are victims of one or more offenses defined in 9this Section. 10    (i) Certification. The Attorney General, a State's 11Attorney, or any law enforcement official shall certify in 12writing to the United States Department of Justice or other 13federal agency, such as the United States Department of 14Homeland Security, that an investigation or prosecution under 15this Section has begun and the individual who is a likely 16victim of a crime described in this Section is willing to 17cooperate or is cooperating with the investigation to enable 18the individual, if eligible under federal law, to qualify for 19an appropriate special immigrant visa and to access available 20federal benefits. Cooperation with law enforcement shall not 21be required of victims of a crime described in this Section who 22are under 18 years of age. This certification shall be made 23available to the victim and his or her designated legal 24representative. 25    (j) A person who commits involuntary servitude, 26involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in   SB3094- 8 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1persons under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section is 2subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 3Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 4    (k) Prohibition of plea bargains.5        (1) No person charged with involuntary sexual 6    servitude of a minor or trafficking in persons if the 7    victim is under 18 years of age shall be permitted to plead 8    down to lesser offenses.9        (2) Prosecutors are prohibited from offering plea 10    bargains to lesser offenses to those individuals charged 11    with involuntary sexual servitude of a minor or 12    trafficking in persons if the victim is under 18 years of 13    age. 14(Source: P.A. 104-159, eff. 1-1-26.) 15    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.3)16    Sec. 11-9.3. Presence within school zone by child sex 17offenders prohibited; approaching, contacting, residing with, 18or communicating with a child within certain places by child 19sex offenders prohibited.20    (a) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly be 21present in any school building, on real property comprising 22any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 23by a school to transport students to or from school or a 24school-related school related activity when persons under the 25age of 18 are present in the building, on the grounds or in the   SB3094- 9 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1conveyance, unless the offender is a parent or guardian of a 2student attending the school and the parent or guardian is: 3(i) attending a conference at the school with school personnel 4to discuss the progress of his or her child academically or 5socially, (ii) participating in child review conferences in 6which evaluation and placement decisions may be made with 7respect to his or her child regarding special education 8services, or (iii) attending conferences to discuss other 9student issues concerning his or her child such as retention 10and promotion and notifies the principal of the school of his 11or her presence at the school or unless the offender has 12permission to be present from the superintendent or the school 13board or in the case of a private school from the principal. In 14the case of a public school, if permission is granted, the 15superintendent or school board president must inform the 16principal of the school where the sex offender will be 17present. Notification includes the nature of the sex 18offender's visit and the hours in which the sex offender will 19be present in the school. The sex offender is responsible for 20notifying the principal's office when he or she arrives on 21school property and when he or she departs from school 22property. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity 23of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the 24direct supervision of a school official.25    (a-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 26be present within 100 feet of a site posted as a pick-up or   SB3094- 10 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1discharge stop for a conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 2by a school to transport students to or from school or a 3school-related school related activity when one or more 4persons under the age of 18 are present at the site. 5    (a-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 6knowingly be present in any public park building, a playground 7or recreation area within any publicly accessible privately 8owned building, or on real property comprising any public park 9when persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or 10on the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 11child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 12guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 13building or on the grounds. 14    (b) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 15loiter within 500 feet of a school building or real property 16comprising any school while persons under the age of 18 are 17present in the building or on the grounds, unless the offender 18is a parent or guardian of a student attending the school and 19the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a conference at the 20school with school personnel to discuss the progress of his or 21her child academically or socially, (ii) participating in 22child review conferences in which evaluation and placement 23decisions may be made with respect to his or her child 24regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 25conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 26her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the   SB3094- 11 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 2has permission to be present from the superintendent or the 3school board or in the case of a private school from the 4principal. In the case of a public school, if permission is 5granted, the superintendent or school board president must 6inform the principal of the school where the sex offender will 7be present. Notification includes the nature of the sex 8offender's visit and the hours in which the sex offender will 9be present in the school. The sex offender is responsible for 10notifying the principal's office when he or she arrives on 11school property and when he or she departs from school 12property. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity 13of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the 14direct supervision of a school official.15    (b-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 16loiter on a public way within 500 feet of a public park 17building or real property comprising any public park while 18persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or on 19the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 20child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 21guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 22building or on the grounds. 23    (b-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 24reside within 500 feet of a school building or the real 25property comprising any school that persons under the age of 2618 attend. Nothing in this subsection (b-5) prohibits a child   SB3094- 12 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a school 2building or the real property comprising any school that 3persons under 18 attend if the property is owned by the child 4sex offender and was purchased before July 7, 2000 (the 5effective date of Public Act 91-911).6    (b-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 7knowingly reside within 500 feet of a playground, child care 8institution, day care center, part day child care facility, 9day care home, group day care home, or a facility providing 10programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under 1118 years of age. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) prohibits a 12child sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a 13playground or a facility providing programs or services 14exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of age if 15the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 16purchased before July 7, 2000. Nothing in this subsection 17(b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from residing within 500 18feet of a child care institution, day care center, or part day 19child care facility if the property is owned by the child sex 20offender and was purchased before June 26, 2006. Nothing in 21this subsection (b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from 22residing within 500 feet of a day care home or group day care 23home if the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 24purchased before August 14, 2008 (the effective date of Public 25Act 95-821). 26    (b-15) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to   SB3094- 13 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1knowingly reside within 500 feet of the victim of the sex 2offense. Nothing in this subsection (b-15) prohibits a child 3sex offender from residing within 500 feet of the victim if the 4property in which the child sex offender resides is owned by 5the child sex offender and was purchased before August 22, 62002. 7    This subsection (b-15) does not apply if the victim of the 8sex offense is 21 years of age or older. 9    (b-20) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 10knowingly communicate, other than for a lawful purpose under 11Illinois law, using the Internet or any other digital media, 12with a person under 18 years of age or with a person whom he or 13she believes to be a person under 18 years of age, unless the 14offender is a parent or guardian of the person under 18 years 15of age. 16    (c) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 17operate, manage, be employed by, volunteer at, be associated 18with, or knowingly be present at any: (i) facility providing 19programs, or services, or entertainment exclusively directed 20toward persons under the age of 18; (ii) day care center; (iii) 21part day child care facility; (iv) child care institution; (v) 22school providing before and after school programs for children 23under 18 years of age; (vi) day care home; or (vii) group day 24care home. This does not prohibit a child sex offender from 25owning the real property upon which the programs or services 26are offered or upon which the day care center, part day child   SB3094- 14 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1care facility, child care institution, or school providing 2before and after school programs for children under 18 years 3of age is located, provided the child sex offender refrains 4from being present on the premises for the hours during which: 5(1) the programs or services are being offered or (2) the day 6care center, part day child care facility, child care 7institution, or school providing before and after school 8programs for children under 18 years of age, day care home, or 9group day care home is operated. 10    (c-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 11participate in a holiday event involving children under 18 12years of age, including, but not limited to, distributing 13candy or other items to children on Halloween, wearing a Santa 14Claus costume on or preceding Christmas, being employed as a 15department store Santa Claus, or wearing an Easter Bunny 16costume on or preceding Easter. For the purposes of this 17subsection, child sex offender has the meaning as defined in 18this Section, but does not include as a sex offense under 19paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section, the offense 20under subsection (c) of Section 11-1.50 of this Code. This 21subsection does not apply to a child sex offender who is a 22parent or guardian of children under 18 years of age that are 23present in the home and other non-familial minors are not 24present.25    (c-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 26operate, manage, be employed by, or be associated with any   SB3094- 15 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1carnival, amusement enterprise, or county or State fair when 2persons under the age of 18 are present. 3    (c-6) It is unlawful for a child sex offender who owns and 4resides at residential real estate to knowingly rent any 5residential unit within the same building in which he or she 6resides to a person who is the parent or guardian of a child or 7children under 18 years of age. This subsection shall apply 8only to leases or other rental arrangements entered into after 9January 1, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-820).10    (c-7) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 11offer or provide any programs or services to persons under 18 12years of age in his or her residence or the residence of 13another or in any facility for the purpose of offering or 14providing such programs or services, whether such programs or 15services are offered or provided by contract, agreement, 16arrangement, or on a volunteer basis.17    (c-8) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 18operate, whether authorized to do so or not, any of the 19following vehicles: (1) a vehicle which is specifically 20designed, constructed or modified and equipped to be used for 21the retail sale of food or beverages, including, but not 22limited to, an ice cream truck; (2) an authorized emergency 23vehicle; or (3) a rescue vehicle. 24    (d) Definitions. In this Section:25        (1) "Child sex offender" means any person who:26            (i) has been charged under Illinois law, or any   SB3094- 16 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1        substantially similar federal law or law of another 2        state, with a sex offense set forth in paragraph (2) of 3        this subsection (d) or the attempt to commit an 4        included sex offense, and the victim is a person under 5        18 years of age at the time of the offense; and:6                (A) is convicted of such offense or an attempt 7            to commit such offense; or8                (B) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 9            of such offense or an attempt to commit such 10            offense; or11                (C) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 12            pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 104-25 of 13            the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of such 14            offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or15                (D) is the subject of a finding not resulting 16            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 17            subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 18            Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged 19            commission or attempted commission of such 20            offense; or21                (E) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 22            following a hearing conducted pursuant to a 23            federal law or the law of another state 24            substantially similar to subsection (c) of Section 25            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 26            of such offense or of the attempted commission of   SB3094- 17 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1            such offense; or2                (F) is the subject of a finding not resulting 3            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 4            a federal law or the law of another state 5            substantially similar to subsection (a) of Section 6            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 7            for the alleged violation or attempted commission 8            of such offense; or9            (ii) is certified as a sexually dangerous person 10        pursuant to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons 11        Act, or any substantially similar federal law or the 12        law of another state, when any conduct giving rise to 13        such certification is committed or attempted against a 14        person less than 18 years of age; or15            (iii) is subject to the provisions of Section 2 of 16        the Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous 17        Persons Act.18        Convictions that result from or are connected with the 19    same act, or result from offenses committed at the same 20    time, shall be counted for the purpose of this Section as 21    one conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law 22    is not a conviction for purposes of this Section.23        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2.5), 24    "sex offense" means:25            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 26        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of   SB3094- 18 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1        2012: 2                10-4 (forcible detention), 3                10-7 (aiding or abetting child abduction under 4            Section 10-5(b)(10)), 5                10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 6                11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of 7            a child), 8                11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 9                11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult), 10                11-9.1 (sexual exploitation of a child), 11                11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 12                11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 13            disability), 14                11-11 (sexual relations within families), 15                11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by 16            advancing prostitution), 17                11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution by 18            profiting from prostitution by compelling a person 19            to be a person engaged in the sex trade), 20                11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution by 21            profiting from prostitution by means other than as 22            described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of 23            paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 24            11-14.3), 25                11-14.4 (promoting commercial sexual 26            exploitation of a child),   SB3094- 19 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1                11-18.1 (patronizing a sexually exploited 2            child), 3                11-20.1 (child sexual abuse material or child 4            pornography), 5                11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 6                11-21 (harmful material), 7                11-25 (grooming), 8                11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling 9            to meet a child), 10                12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child), 11                11-20 (obscenity) (when that offense was 12            committed in any school, on real property 13            comprising any school, in any conveyance owned, 14            leased, or contracted by a school to transport 15            students to or from school or a school-related 16            school related activity, or in a public park), 17                11-30 (public indecency) (when committed in a 18            school, on real property comprising a school, in 19            any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a 20            school to transport students to or from school or 21            a school-related school related activity, or in a 22            public park). 23                An attempt to commit any of these offenses.24            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 25        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 26        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of   SB3094- 20 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1        age: 2                11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 3                11-1.30 (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 4                11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse), 5                11-1.60 (aggravated criminal sexual abuse). 6                An attempt to commit any of these offenses.7            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 8        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 9        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 10        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:11                10-1 (kidnapping),12                10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),13                10-3 (unlawful restraint),14                10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),15                11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a 16            child). 17                An attempt to commit any of these offenses.18            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 19        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 20        clause (2)(i) or (2)(ii) of subsection (d) of this 21        Section.22        (2.5) For the purposes of subsections (b-5) and (b-10) 23    only, a sex offense means:24            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 25        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 26        2012:  SB3094- 21 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1                10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 2                10-7 (aiding or abetting child abduction under 3            Section 10-5(b)(10)), 4                11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of 5            a child), 6                11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 7                11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult), 8                11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 9                11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 10            disability), 11                11-11 (sexual relations within families), 12                11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by 13            advancing prostitution), 14                11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution by 15            profiting from prostitution by compelling a person 16            to be a person engaged in the sex trade), 17                11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution by 18            profiting from prostitution by means other than as 19            described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of 20            paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 21            11-14.3), 22                11-14.4 (promoting commercial sexual 23            exploitation of a child), 24                11-18.1 (patronizing a sexually exploited 25            child), 26                11-20.1 (child sexual abuse material or child   SB3094- 22 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1            pornography), 2                11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 3                11-25 (grooming), 4                11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling 5            to meet a child), or 6                12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child). 7                An attempt to commit any of these offenses.8            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 9        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 10        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 11        age: 12                11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 13                11-1.30 (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 14                11-1.60 (aggravated criminal sexual abuse), 15            and 16                subsection (a) of Section 11-1.50 (criminal 17            sexual abuse). 18                An attempt to commit any of these offenses.19            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 20        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 21        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 22        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:23                10-1 (kidnapping),24                10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),25                10-3 (unlawful restraint),26                10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),  SB3094- 23 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1                11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a 2            child). 3                An attempt to commit any of these offenses.4            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 5        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in this 6        paragraph (2.5) of this subsection.7        (3) A conviction for an offense of federal law or the 8    law of another state that is substantially equivalent to 9    any offense listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 10    this Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose 11    of this Section. A finding or adjudication as a sexually 12    dangerous person under any federal law or law of another 13    state that is substantially equivalent to the Sexually 14    Dangerous Persons Act shall constitute an adjudication for 15    the purposes of this Section.16        (4) "Authorized emergency vehicle", "rescue vehicle", 17    and "vehicle" have the meanings ascribed to them in 18    Sections 1-105, 1-171.8 and 1-217, respectively, of the 19    Illinois Vehicle Code. 20        (5) "Child care institution" has the meaning ascribed 21    to it in Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 22        (6) "Day care center" has the meaning ascribed to it 23    in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 24        (7) "Day care home" has the meaning ascribed to it in 25    Section 2.18 of the Child Care Act of 1969.26        (8) "Facility providing programs or services directed   SB3094- 24 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1    towards persons under the age of 18" means any facility 2    providing programs or services exclusively directed 3    towards persons under the age of 18.4        (9) "Group day care home" has the meaning ascribed to 5    it in Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 6        (10) "Internet" has the meaning set forth in Section 7    16-0.1 of this Code. 8        (11) "Loiter" means:9            (i) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 10        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 11        school or public park property.12            (ii) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 13        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 14        school or public park property, for the purpose of 15        committing or attempting to commit a sex offense.16            (iii) Entering or remaining in a building in or 17        around school property, other than the offender's 18        residence.19        (12) "Part day child care facility" has the meaning 20    ascribed to it in Section 2.10 of the Child Care Act of 21    1969. 22        (13) "Playground" means a piece of land owned or 23    controlled by a unit of local government that is 24    designated by the unit of local government for use solely 25    or primarily for children's recreation. 26        (14) "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve,   SB3094- 25 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the 2    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government. 3        (15) "School" means a public or private preschool or 4    elementary or secondary school. 5        (16) "School official" means the principal, a teacher, 6    or any other certified employee of the school, the 7    superintendent of schools or a member of the school board.8    (e) For the purposes of this Section, the 500 feet 9distance shall be measured from: (1) the edge of the property 10of the school building or the real property comprising the 11school that is closest to the edge of the property of the child 12sex offender's residence or where he or she is loitering, and 13(2) the edge of the property comprising the public park 14building or the real property comprising the public park, 15playground, child care institution, day care center, part day 16child care facility, or facility providing programs or 17services exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of 18age, or a victim of the sex offense who is under 21 years of 19age, to the edge of the child sex offender's place of residence 20or place where he or she is loitering. 21    (f) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 22of a Class 4 felony.23(Source: P.A. 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 104-245, eff. 1-1-26; 24revised 11-21-25.) 25    (720 ILCS 5/11-25)  SB3094- 26 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1    Sec. 11-25. Grooming.2    (a) A person commits grooming when, being 5 years or more 3older than a child, or holding a position of trust, authority, 4or supervision in relation to the child at the time of the 5offense, he or she knowingly: 6        (1) uses a computer on-line service, Internet service, 7    local bulletin board service, or any other device capable 8    of electronic data storage or transmission, performs an 9    act in person or by conduct through a third party, or uses 10    written communication to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, 11    or attempt to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, a child, a 12    child's guardian, or another person believed by the person 13    to be a child or a child's guardian, to commit any sex 14    offense, to distribute photographs depicting the sex 15    organs of the child, or to otherwise engage in any 16    unlawful sexual conduct with a child or with another 17    person believed by the person to be a child; or 18        (2) engages in a pattern of conduct that seduces, 19    solicits, lures, or entices, or attempts to seduce, 20    solicit, lure, or entice, a child to engage or participate 21    in unlawful sexual conduct that is for the purpose of 22    sexual gratification or arousal of the victim, the 23    accused, or another.24    (a-5) As used in this Section: 25    "Child" means a person under 17 years of age. 26    "Pattern" means 2 or more instances of conduct.   SB3094- 27 -LRB104 18941 RLC 32386 b1    "Sex offense" means any violation of Article 11 of this 2Code. 3    "Sexual conduct" means masturbation, sexual conduct, or 4sexual penetration as defined in Section 11-0.1 of this Code. 5    (a-6) Illinois has a compelling interest in effective 6education and "grooming" does not include conduct that serves 7a legitimate educational purpose pursuant to Section 27-9.1a 8of the School Code. 9    (a-7) Prohibition of plea bargains.10        (1) No person charged with grooming shall be permitted 11    to plead down to lesser offenses.12        (2) Prosecutors are prohibited from offering plea 13    bargains to lesser offenses to those individuals charged 14    with grooming. 15    (b) Sentence. Grooming is a Class 4 felony. 16(Source: P.A. 104-245, eff. 1-1-26.)